Florida, session 2026, HB4053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 3 of section 3 of chapter 2005-347,
Laws of Florida, as amended by section 1 of chapter 2024-297,
Laws of Florida, is amended to read:
Section 3. Procedures for the levy and collection of non-
ad valorem assessments.—
(1) The district is authorized to levy and enforce non-ad
valorem assessments in accordance with chapters 170, 189, 191,
and 197, Florida Statutes, as amended from time to time.
However, the district may not levy and enforce non-ad valorem
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4053 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4053, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
assessments on a church or religious institution that is
otherwise exempt from ad valorem taxes.
(2)(a) For commercial and industrial properties, the non-
ad valorem assessments shall be calculated using the combined
total square footage of all buildings and structures located on
the parcel, regardless of the number of structures. For
residential properties, the non-ad valorem assessments shall
continue to be applied per residential dwelling unit.
(b) The non-ad valorem assessments may be levied up to the
following maximum amounts:
1.(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for residential properties
up to 1,600 square feet, with an additional $0.13 $0.1544 per
square foot in excess of 1,600 square feet, with the total
assessment levied not to exceed $350.
2.(b) Thirty dollars and 96 cents for vacant land.
3. Five hundred dollars for properties with a
predominantly commercial use code up to 2,500 square feet, with
an additional $0.13 per square foot in excess of 2,500 square
feet.
4.(c) Five hundred dollars for commercial properties with
a predominantly industrial use code up to 2,500 950 square feet,
with an additional $0.13 $0.1544 per square foot in excess of
2,500 950 square feet up to 40,000 square feet, with an
additional $0.05 per square foot in excess of 40,000 square
feet.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4053 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4053, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
5.(d) Thirty dollars and 96 cents for unimproved acreage
up to 3 acres, with an additional $10.32 per acre in excess of 3
acres.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "use
code" shall mean the property use classifications assigned by
the Santa Rosa County Property Appraiser in accordance with the
property use code system established by the Department of
Revenue pursuant to chapter 195, Florida Statutes. The district
shall rely on such classifications, as reflected on the most
recent certified tax roll, when determining the applicable non-
ad valorem assessment.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4053 -02-er